Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 6. Fraud
§ 6-3-614.
Defrauding drug and alcohol screening tests; penalties.

A person is guilty of defrauding a drug and alcohol screening test if he:

Manufactures, sells, gives away, distributes or markets synthetic or human substances or other products including, but not limited to urine, in this state or transports synthetic or human substances or other products including, but not limited to urine, into this state with the intent to defraud a drug or alcohol screening test;

Attempts to foil or defeat a drug or alcohol screening test by the substitution or spiking of a sample with the intent to defraud an alcohol or drug screening test;

Adulterates a hair follicle sample or a urine or other bodily fluid sample with the intent to defraud a drug or alcohol screening test;

Possesses adulterants which are intended to be used to adulterate a urine or other bodily fluid sample for the purpose of defrauding a drug or alcohol screening test; or

Sells adulterants which are intended to be used to adulterate a urine or other bodily fluid sample for the purpose of defrauding a drug or alcohol screening test.

Instructions which provide a method for thwarting a drug-screening test and which accompany the sale, giving, distribution or marketing of synthetic or human substances or other products including, but not limited to urine, are prima facie evidence of intent under subsection (a) of this section.

A person who violates any provision of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of:

A misdemeanor for a first offense and, upon conviction, shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both;

A misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense and, upon conviction, shall be subject to imprisonment for not less than seven (7) days nor more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 59, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 59, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 6-3-615.
Use of false identity, citizenship or resident alien documents, penalty.

Any person who intentionally uses false documents to conceal his true identity, citizenship or resident alien status to obtain access to public resources or services is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

An official who is presented with any document in connection with an application for a driver’s license or Wyoming identification card issued by the Wyoming department of transportation, and who has probable cause to believe that it is a false document in violation of subsection (a) of this section, is authorized to seize and retain the document. Upon seizure, the document shall be delivered to a law enforcement official having jurisdiction to investigate the violation as soon as reasonably possible. If the investigation shows that the document is not a false document, the document shall be returned to the person immediately.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 214, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 214, § 1, enacted this section as §

6-3-614

. It has been redesignated as §

6-3-615

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 214, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.